Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1021
Consolidation of districts; county board; order.

Two or more districts incorporated in the manner provided by sections 46-1001 to 46-1020 prior to July 1, 1972, may be consolidated by order of the county board of the county in which the district with the largest acreage of land was originally incorporated and organized.

Laws 1972, LB 1502, § 2.